vi: Loại thanh hướng dẫn cưa xích: Điêu khắc; Hai đầu; Nhiều lớp; Nhẹ; Cứu hộ; Rắn; Khác
fr: Type de guide-chaîne: Pointe de découpe; Double extrémité; Feuilleté; Léger; Secours; Solide; Autre
lt-LT: Grandininio pjūklo juostos tipas: Drožimo; Dvipusė; Laminuota; Lengva; Gelbėjimo; Kieta; Kita
el: Τύπος κόφτη πούρων: Carving (γλυπτικής); Διπλής άκρης; Συγκολλητή (πολύστρωτη) λάμα; Ελαφριά; Διάσωσης; Συμπαγής; Άλλο
hu: Láncfűrész vezetőlemez típusa: Faragott; Kétvégű; Laminált; Könnyű; Védelmi; Szilárd; Egyéb
fi: Moottorisahan laipan tyyppi: Veisto; Kaksipäinen; Laminoitu; Kevyt; Pelastus; Kiinteä; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta meča za motorne žage: Rezbarjenje; Dvostranski; Laminirano; Lahek; Reševalna; Trden; Druga
de: Typ für Kettensägenschwerter: Carving; Doppelende; Laminiert; Leicht; Rettung; Solide; Sonstiges
en: Chainsaw bar type: Carving; Double ended; Laminated; Lightweight; Rescue; Solid; Other
nb: Motorsagblad: Utskjæring; Dobbeltsidig; Laminert; Lett; Redning; Fast; Annet
da: Motorsavssværdtype: Udskæring; Dobbeltendet; Lamineret; Letvægt; Rescue; Solid; Andet
it: Tipo di barra di motosega: Intaglio; Doppia estremità; Laminato; Leggero; Soccorso; Solido; Altro
ja: チェーンソーバーのタイプ: カービング; ダブルエンド; ラミネート加工; 軽量; レスキュー; ソリッド; その他
pl: Typ prowadnicy do piły łańcuchowej: Prowadnica rzeźbiarska; Dwustronne; Prowadnica laminowana; Lekkie; Ratownicza; Pełne; Pozostałe
hr-HR: Vrsta mača za motornu pilu: Rezbarenje; Dvostrano; Laminirano; Lagana; Spasilačka; Čvrsta; Ostalo
sv: Typ av svärdsspets för motorsåg: Träsnideri; Dubbelsidig; Laminerad; Lättvikt; Räddning; Solid; Övrigt
bg-BG: Тип шина на верижен трион: За дърворезба; Двустранно; Ламинирана; Олекотено; Спасителна шина за моторен трион; Плътна шина; Друго
ru: Тип шины бензопилы: Карвинг; Двухсторонняя; Ламинированный; Облегченная; Спасательная; Цельнометаллическая; Другая
th: ประเภทบาร์เลื่อยยนต์: บาร์แกะสลัก; สองด้าน; บาร์ลามิเนต; น้ำหนักเบา; กู้ภัย; แผ่นตัน; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo da barra da motosserra: Escultura; Duas pontas; Laminado; Leve; Resgate; Maciço; Outro
zh-CN: 链锯导板类型: 雕刻; 双头式; 层压; 轻质; 救援型; 实心; 其他
ko: 체인톱 바 유형: 카빙; 양면; 적층; 경량; 구조; 솔리드; 기타
sk-SK: Typ lišty reťazovej píly: Vyrezávacia; Obojstranný; Laminovaná; Ľahká; Záchranný; Pevný; Iné
es: Tipo de barra de la motosierra: Tallado; Doble punta; Laminado; Liviano; Rescate; Sólido; Otros
tr: Motorlu testere kılavuz tipi: Oyma; Çift uçlu; Laminasyonlu; Hafif; Kurtarma; Düz; Diğer
nl: Type kettingzaagblad: Snijwerk; Dubbelzijdig; Gelamineerd; Lichtgewicht; Redding; Stevig; Overig
ro-RO: Tip de lamă de drujbă: Sculptat; Cu două capete; Laminat; Ușoară; De salvare; Solidă; Altele
zh-TW: 鏈鋸導板類型: 雕刻; 雙端; 層壓式; 輕型; 救援; 實心; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de barra para motosserra: Entalhe; Dupla extremidade; Laminado; Leve; Resgate; Sólido; Outro
cs: Typ vodicí lišty motorové pily: Carvingová; Oboustranné; Laminovaná; Lehké; Záchranářské; Masivní; Jiné